Louisiana, session 2026, HB769.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Code of Criminal Procedure Article 313(A)(2) is hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
Art. 313. Gwen's Law; bail hearings; detention without bail
A.
* * *
(2)(a) A contradictory bail hearing, as provided for in this Paragraph, may
be held prior to setting bail for a person in custody who is charged with domestic
abuse battery, violation of protective orders, stalking, or any felony offense involving
the use or threatened use of force or a deadly weapon upon the defendant's family
member, as defined in R.S. 46:2132 or upon the defendant's household member as
defined in R.S. 14:35.3, or upon the defendant's dating partner, as defined in R.S.
46:2151. If the court orders a contradictory hearing, the hearing shall be held within
five days from the date of determination of probable cause, exclusive of weekends
and legal holidays. At the contradictory hearing, the court shall determine the
conditions of bail or whether the defendant should be held without bail pending trial.
If the court decides not to hold a contradictory hearing, it shall notify the prosecuting
attorney prior to setting bail.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of Subsubparagraph (a) of this
Subparagraph, a person charged with any crime listed in this Paragraph, and for whom a
determination of probable cause has been made, may be held without bail for not less than
forty-eight hours nor more than seventy-two hours following the determination of
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 769 ENROLLED
probable cause. This holding period shall run concurrently with the time period
provided in Article 230.1.
(c) In deciding whether to impose the holding period authorized by
Subsubparagraph (b) of this Subparagraph, the court shall consider any facts
presented that indicate an increased risk to the victim, including but not limited to
stalking, strangulation, violation of a protective order, use or threatened use of force
or a deadly weapon, serious bodily injury, or documented threats to the victim, the
victim's family, or the public.
(d) The holding period provided for in Subsubparagraph (b) of this
Subparagraph may be referred to as a "cooling off" period for the benefit of the
victim.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.